Maine, session 132, LD529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Page 1 - 132LR2003(03)

Sec. 1. District established; general provisions. The Alamoosook Lake
Watershed Management District, referred to in this Act as "the district," is established as a
quasi-municipal corporation, incorporated for the purposes described in this Act.
1. Tax exemption. The property, both real and personal, rights and franchises of the
district held within the boundaries of the Town of Orland are forever exempt from taxation.
2. Liability. The district is a governmental entity for the purposes of the Maine Tort
Claims Act.
3. Funding eligibility. The district qualifies for any grants, loans or other funding in
the same manner as a municipality.
4. Watershed district. The district is eligible for state agency assistance for watershed
districts as provided in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 2012.
5. Fiscal year. The fiscal year of the district is from July 1st to June 30th of each year.
Sec. 2. Governance. The affairs of the district are managed by a board of trustees,
referred to in this Act as "the board," made up of a combination of trustees appointed by
the municipal officers of the Town of Orland and trustees elected by the owners of the
waterfront properties abutting Alamoosook Lake, referred to in this Act as "the waterfront
property owners."
1. Membership. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board consists of 5
trustees as follows:
A. Three trustees appointed by the municipal officers of the Town of Orland; and
B. Two trustees elected by the waterfront property owners as provided in this section.
2. Nominations for election. Candidates for election by the waterfront property
owners must be nominated by a lake or pond association representing at least 20% of the
waterfront properties abutting Alamoosook Lake. If no such association is in existence,
the nomination process is as adopted by the board.
3. Conduct of elections. Upon the establishment of the district, the trustees appointed
by the Town of Orland shall conduct the initial election of the trustees for the waterfront
property owners. The full board shall conduct elections subsequent to the initial election.
The election ballot must list the names of each trustee candidate and whether the candidates
are seeking a full term or to complete the remaining term for a vacant board seat and must
include any write-in candidates. Regardless of the number of actual or beneficial owners
of a waterfront property, a duly authorized representative of each waterfront property
owner may cast one vote for each open board seat listed on the election ballot. The
candidate or, in the event that more than one board seat is listed on the election ballot,
candidates who receive the most votes cast must be declared elected.
4. Staggered terms. The initial terms of the trustees appointed by the Town of Orland
and the trustees for the waterfront property owners must be staggered, as determined by
lot, with as closely as possible equal numbers of trustees serving initial terms of one year,
2 years and 3 years. Subsequently appointed or elected trustees serve 3-year terms.
5. Vacancies. In the event a board seat occupied by a trustee appointed by the
municipal officers of the Town of Orland under subsection 1, paragraph A becomes vacant,
the municipal officers of the Town of Orland may appoint a replacement trustee to complete
Page 2 - 132LR2003(03)

the term for that seat. In the event a board seat occupied by a trustee elected by the
waterfront property owners under this section becomes vacant, a lake or pond association
representing the greatest percentage of waterfront properties abutting Alamoosook Lake
may appoint an interim trustee to that seat until a replacement trustee is elected at the next
regular annual election of trustees. If the association fails to appoint an interim trustee or
if no such association is in existence, the seat remains vacant until the next regular annual
election.
6. Quorum; voting. A majority of the trustees appointed and elected to the board
must be present at a meeting of the board to constitute a quorum. The board may take an
action requiring a vote only upon the affirmative vote of:
A. A majority of the trustees appointed and elected, regardless of the number of
trustees present and voting at a meeting; and
B. At least one trustee appointed by the Town of Orland and at least one trustee elected
by the waterfront property owners.
7. Effect of withdrawal. If the Town of Orland withdraws from the district in
accordance with section 6, the trustees appointed to represent the Town of Orland must be
reduced to one, with that reduction determined by lot, and the number of trustees for the
waterfront property owners must be increased to 4, with the additional seats to be filled in
the same manner as a vacancy for a board seat for the waterfront property owners under
subsection 5.
Sec. 3. Powers; responsibilities. The district may sue; make contracts; apply for
and accept grant or loan funds; accept gifts; purchase, lease, devise or otherwise acquire,
hold or dispose of real or personal property; disburse money; contract debt; adopt rules;
and do such other acts as necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities described
in this section.
1. Powers. The district may:
A. Develop operational rules for the management of the district, including developing
topic-specific committees with outside experts when necessary;
B. Deliver an annual request to the Town of Orland, subject to voter approval, to fund
a portion of the district's operating and other costs;
C. Levy and collect an assessment on the waterfront property owners to fund a portion
of the district's operating and other costs and establish a lien on a waterfront property
in the event the waterfront property owner does not pay in full the assessed amount by
the date the payment is due; and
D. Enter into cooperative agreements with other watershed management districts,
municipalities and entities for the purposes of planning, operations and maintenance
and watershed improvement and for other purposes determined by the district.
2. Responsibilities. The district is responsible for:
A. Acquiring ownership of, owning, maintaining and operating the dam, the land under
the dam, the equipment and other personal property necessary to maintain and operate
the dam and flowage and access rights associated with the dam on Alamoosook Lake,
including general operations, managing water levels and flow, managing inspections,
planning for upgrades or repairs and other dam management activities;
Page 3 - 132LR2003(03)

B. Preparing an annual operating and capital budget as described in this Act;
C. Holding at least one public meeting to discuss the district's annual proposed budget
as described in this Act, which must be held at least 2 weeks prior to a vote by the
legislative body of the Town of Orland on an article requesting the annual municipal
contribution;
D. Conducting elections of trustees for the waterfront property owners;
E. Electing trustees as officers of the board;
F. Administering the affairs of the district, including, but not limited to, financial
management activities, record keeping, public communications and contract
management; and
G. Proactively assessing watershed improvements and developing policies and
practices to enhance the Alamoosook Lake watershed, including seeking funding
opportunities for watershed improvements such as fish passage improvements,
courtesy boat inspections and water quality and invasive species monitoring activities.
Sec. 4. Annual operating and capital budget. The board shall develop an annual
operating budget, which must include proposed appropriations into reserves for any capital
expenditure purpose or capital expenditure appropriations as described in this section.
1. Budget hearing; board approval. Prior to January 15th of each year and with
sufficient time to incorporate any public input, the board shall hold a public budget hearing.
At the budget hearing, the board shall explain the proposed budget, and residents of the
Town of Orland and the waterfront property owners must be given an opportunity to be
heard. At the budget hearing, only those items concerning the expenses necessary to
operate the district, appropriations for a reserve fund and capital expenditure are subject to
public input. A proposed annual budget may not be finalized and submitted for
appropriation to the Town of Orland unless approved by the board as follows:
A. A proposed annual budget of less than $100,000 may be finalized and approved
only by the affirmative vote of a majority of the trustees appointed and elected to the
board, regardless of the number of trustees present and voting, if at least one such
affirmative vote is provided by a trustee appointed by the Town of Orland under section
2, subsection 1, paragraph A and at least one such affirmative vote is provided by a
trustee elected by the waterfront property owners under section 2; and
B. A proposed annual budget of $100,000 or more may be finalized and approved only
by the affirmative vote of 2/3 of the trustees appointed and elected to the board,
regardless of the number of trustees present and voting.
The $100,000 budget figure in paragraphs A and B must be adjusted annually for
cumulative price inflation since December 31, 2024, based on the change in the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, Annual City Average, for the Northeast Region, as
published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics or, if that
statistic is no longer published or available, by an alternative measure of price inflation as
determined by the board.
The board shall ensure that the final annual budget is finalized for approval no later than
January 15th.
2. Budget approval process. Upon finalization of the annual budget by the board,
the Town of Orland, for consideration at a town meeting, shall incorporate a warrant article
Page 4 - 132LR2003(03)

as described in this section to allow the voters of the town to approve or reject the budget.
During the initial funding period for the district, any requests for appropriation from the
district may include only those amounts in excess of the amounts already appropriated by
the Town of Orland at the time the district was formed.
The district shall provide information in print or electronic format regarding the annual
budget and appropriation request to the Town of Orland prior to and at the town's annual
town meeting, which must include the total amounts proposed by the district for each cost
center summary budget category, the amount approved by the board after public input
gathered at the budget hearing and a summary of the total authorized expenditures for the
district.
The board shall prepare the warrant article for this purpose and shall deliver the article to
the municipal clerk of the Town of Orland no later than February 1st of each year. The
warrant article must be in substantially the following form:
"Do you favor the Town of Orland raising and appropriating from property
tax $ (insert amount) to pay the Town of Orland's municipal contribution
to the Alamoosook Lake Watershed Management District?"
3. Failure to approve municipal contribution. The Town of Orland's vote on the
warrant article determines its obligation to pay the municipal contribution for the budgeted
fiscal year. If the Town of Orland fails to appropriate funds for its municipal contribution,
the amount not appropriated must be included in the assessment on the waterfront property
owners.
Sec. 5. Contributions; assessments. The annual budget for the district as
described in this Act must reflect all expected expenditures and additions to capital
reserves, net of any grants, donations, loans or other anticipated sources of funds. To the
extent that additional funds are required to balance the budget, referred to in this Act as
"the aggregate funds required," the Town of Orland and the waterfront property owners
shall provide funding for the aggregate funds required as follows.
1. Municipal contributions. If approved by the voters of the Town of Orland pursuant
to section 4, the Town of Orland shall provide funding for 50% of the aggregate funds
required, which must be determined by the board in the manner described in section 4. The
Town of Orland's appropriated municipal contribution must be paid to the district prior to
August 1st of each year.
2. Waterfront property owners. The waterfront property owners shall provide
funding for the aggregate funds required that are not provided pursuant to subsection 1,
which must be determined by the board as described in section 4. If the Town of Orland
fails to appropriate funds for its municipal contribution, the amount not appropriated must
be included in the assessment on the waterfront property owners.
A. Each waterfront property owner shall pay an assessment proportionate to the
amount of shoreline frontage along Alamoosook Lake on that waterfront property
owner's lot or parcel. For the purposes of calculating this assessment, the shoreline
frontage is the amount used for the purposes of property tax assessment, up to a
maximum of 300 feet of shoreline frontage, and a lot or parcel with more than 300 feet
of shoreline frontage must be deemed to have only 300 feet of shoreline frontage.
Page 5 - 132LR2003(03)

B. The district shall mail an invoice for the assessment amount due to each waterfront
property owner on a schedule and with a specified payment due date as determined by
the board. Failure to pay the assessment amount by the specified payment due date
incurs interest as determined by the board in a manner consistent with the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 505. The district may place a lien on the lot or parcel
of a waterfront property owner that fails to pay the assessment amount by the specified
payment due date.
Sec. 6. Withdrawal; dissolution. The legislative body of the Town of Orland may
by majority vote elect to withdraw from the district, and the board must approve the
withdrawal, subject to conditions and requirements reasonably necessary for the continued
operation of the district as may be directed by the board. If the Town of Orland fails to
appropriate funds for its municipal contribution in accordance with the requirements of this
Act for 2 consecutive years, it is considered to have withdrawn from the district, subject to
conditions and requirements reasonably necessary for the continued operation of the district
as may be directed by the board. The district may be dissolved upon the disposition of all
of its assets and settlement of any liabilities and by an affirmative vote on dissolution by a
majority of the trustees of the board.
Sec. 7. Authorized activities prior to referendum. Notwithstanding the
referendum requirement of section 8, the municipal officers of the Town of Orland shall
prepare an estimated budget for the district for its first year of operation and shall determine
the aggregate funds required for that year. The municipal officers shall determine the
required municipal contribution for the Town of Orland, which must represent 50% of those
aggregate funds required. The municipal contribution amount determined pursuant to this
section must be used for the purposes of the referendum required in section 8.
Sec. 8. Emergency clause; referendum; effective date. In view of the
emergency cited in the preamble, this Act takes effect when approved only for the purposes
of allowing the municipal officers of the Town of Orland to prepare an estimated budget
and determine the aggregate funds required and required municipal contribution pursuant
to section 7 and for permitting the Act's submission to the legal voters of the Town of
Orland at a referendum called for that purpose and held after June 1, 2025 but within 2
years after the effective date of this Act. The referendum must be called by the municipal
officers of the Town of Orland and must be held at the regular voting places. The
referendum must be called, advertised and conducted according to the law relating to
municipal elections. For the purpose of registration of voters, the registrar of voters must
be in session the regular workday preceding the referendum. The subject matter of this Act
must be reduced to a question in substantially the following form:
"Do you favor the establishment of and the Town of Orland's participation
in the Alamoosook Lake Watershed Management District and the
appropriation of $ (insert amount) to provide the Town of Orland's share
of the estimated budget for the first year of operation of the Alamoosook
Lake Watershed Management District?"
The voters shall indicate by a cross or check mark placed against the word "Yes" or
"No" their opinion of the same.
The results must be declared by the municipal officers of the Town of Orland and due
certificate of the results filed by the clerk with the Secretary of State.
Page 6 - 132LR2003(03)

This Act takes effect for all other purposes immediately upon its approval by a majority
of the legal voters of the Town of Orland voting at the referendum. Failure to achieve the
necessary approval in any referendum does not prohibit subsequent referenda consistent
with this section as long as the referenda are held within 2 years after the effective date of
this Act.
Page 7 - 132LR2003(03)